Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 27 The Energy and Consumer Savings Act of 2005

39-27-1.
General purpose.

This chapter establishes energy and consumer savings by setting minimum efficiency standards for certain products sold or installed in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1.

39-27-2.
Findings.

The legislature finds that:

Efficiency standards for certain products sold or installed in the state assure consumers and businesses that such products meet minimum efficiency performance levels, thus saving money on utility bills.

The efficiency standards save energy and thus reduce pollution and other environmental impacts associated with the production, distribution, and use of electricity and natural gas.

The efficiency standards can make electricity systems more reliable by reducing the strain on the electricity grid during peak demand periods. Furthermore, improved energy efficiency can reduce or delay the need for new power plants, power-transmission lines, and power-distribution system upgrades.

Energy efficiency standards contribute to the economy of this state by helping to better balance energy supply and demand, thus reducing pressure for higher natural gas and electricity prices. By saving consumers and businesses money on energy bills, efficiency standards help the state and local economy, since energy bill savings can be spent on local goods and services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1.

39-27-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Automatic commercial icemaker” means a factory-made assembly that is shipped in one or more packages that consists of a condensing unit and ice-making section operating as an integrated unit, that makes and harvests ice cubes, and that may store and dispense ice. This term includes machines with capacities between and including fifty (50) and two thousand five hundred (2,500) pounds per twenty-four (24) hours.

“Ballast” means a device used with an electric discharge lamp to obtain necessary circuit conditions (voltage, current and waveform) for starting and operating the lamp.

“Boiler” means a self-contained, low-pressure appliance for supplying steam or hot water primarily designed for space heating.

“Bottle-type water dispenser” means a water dispenser that uses a bottle or reservoir as the source of potable water.

“Chief of Energy and Community Services” means the head official of the Rhode Island state energy office.

“Commercial clothes washer” means a soft-mount horizontal or vertical-axis clothes washer that:

Has a clothes container compartment no greater than three and one-half cubic feet (3.5 cu ft.) in the case of a horizontal-axis product or no greater than four cubic feet (4 cu ft.) in the case of a vertical-axis product; and

Is designed for use by more than one household, such as in multifamily housing, apartments, or coin laundries.

“Commercial hot food holding cabinet” means an appliance that is a heated, fully-enclosed compartment with one or more solid doors, and that is designed to maintain the temperature of hot food that has been cooked in a separate appliance. “Commercial hot food holding cabinet” does not include heated glass merchandizing cabinets, drawer warmers, or cook-and-hold appliances.

“Commercial pre-rinse spray valve” means a hand-held device designed and marketed for use with commercial dishwashing and ware washing equipment and that sprays water on dishes, flatware, and other food service items for the purpose of removing food residue prior to their cleaning.

“Commercial refrigerator, freezer, and refrigerator-freezer” means self-contained refrigeration equipment that:

Is not a consumer product as regulated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 6291 and subsequent sections;

Operates at a chilled, frozen, combination chilled/frozen, or variable temperature for the purpose of storing and/or merchandising food, beverages, and/or ice;

May have transparent and/or solid hinged doors, sliding doors, or a combination of hinged and sliding doors; and

Incorporates most components involved in the vapor compression cycle and the refrigerated compartment in a single cabinet.

This term does not include:

(i)

Units with eighty-five cubic feet (85 cu. ft.) or more of internal volume;

(ii)

Walk-in refrigerators or freezers;

(iii)

Units with no doors; or

(iv)

Freezers specifically designed for ice cream.

“Commission” means the Rhode Island public utilities commission.

“Compensation” means money or any other valuable thing, regardless of form, received, or to be received, by a person for services rendered.

“Electricity ratio” is the ratio of furnace electricity use to total furnace energy use. Electricity ratio = (3.412*EAE/(1000*Ef +3.412*EAE)) where EAE (average annual auxiliary electrical consumption) and EF (average annual fuel energy consumption) are defined in Appendix N to subpart B of part 430 of title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

“High-intensity discharge lamp” means a lamp in which light is produced by the passage of an electric current through a vapor or gas, and in which the light-producing arc is stabilized by bulb wall temperature and the arc tube has a bulb wall loading in excess of three watts (3 W) per square centimeter.

“Illuminated exit sign” means an internally-illuminated sign that is designed to be permanently fixed in place to identify a building exit and consists of an electrically powered integral light source that illuminates the legend “EXIT” and any directional indicators and provides contrast between the legend, any directional indicators and the background.

“Large packaged air-conditioning equipment” means electronically-operated, air-cooled air-conditioning and air-conditioning heat pump equipment having cooling capacity greater than, or equal to, two hundred forty thousand (240,000) Btu/hour but less than seven hundred sixty thousand (760,000) Btu/hour that is built as a package and shipped as a whole to end-user sites.

“Low-voltage dry-type distribution transformer” means a transformer that:

Has an input voltage of six hundred volts (600 V) or less;

Is air-cooled;

Does not use oil as a coolant; and

Is rated for operation at a frequency of sixty hertz (60 Hz).

“Mercury-vapor lamp” means a high-intensity discharge lamp in which the major portion of the light is produced by radiation from mercury operating at a partial pressure in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) PA (approximately 1 atm). This includes clear, phosphor-coated, and self-ballasted lamps.

“Metal-halide lamp” means a high-intensity discharge lamp in which the major portion of the light is produced by radiation of metal halides and their products of dissociation, possibly in combination with metallic vapors.

“Metal-halide lamp fixture” means a lamp fixture designed to be operated with a metal-halide lamp and a ballast for a metal-halide lamp.

“Probe-start metal-halide ballast” means a ballast used to operate metal-halide lamps that does not contain an igniter and instead starts lamps by using a third starting electrode “probe” in the arc tube.

“Pulldown refrigerator” means a commercial refrigerator with doors that, when fully loaded with twelve-ounce (12) canned beverages at ninety (90) degrees F, can cool these beverages to an average stable temperature of thirty-eight (38) degrees F in twelve (12) hours or less.

“Residential boiler” means a self-contained appliance for supplying steam or hot water, that uses natural gas, propane, or home heating oil and has a heat input rate of less than three hundred thousand (300,000) Btu per hour.

“Residential furnace” means a self-contained space heater designed to supply heated air through ducts of more than ten inches (10") length and utilizes only single-phase electric current, or single-phase electric current or DC current in conjunction with natural gas, propane, or home-heating oil, and that:

Is designed to be the principal heating source for the living space of one or more residences;

Is not contained within the same cabinet with a central air conditioner whose rated cooling capacity is above sixty-five thousand (65,000) Btu per hour; and

Has a heat input rate of less than two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) Btu per hour.

“Single-voltage external AC to DC power supply” means a device that:

Is designed to convert line-voltage AC input into lower-voltage DC output;

Is able to convert to one DC output voltage at a time;

Is sold with, or intended to be used with, a separate end-use product that constitutes the primary power load;

Is contained within a separate physical enclosure from the end-use product;

Is connected to the end-use product via a removable or hard-wired male/female electrical connection, cable, cord, or other wiring;

Does not have batteries or battery packs, including those that are removable, that physically attach directly to the power supply unit;

Does not have a battery chemistry or type selector switch and indicator light; or

Has a nameplate output power less than or equal to two hundred fifty watts (250 W).

“State-regulated incandescent reflector lamp” means a lamp, not colored or designed for rough or vibration service applications, with an inner reflective coating on the outer bulb to direct the light, an E26 medium screw base, a rated voltage or voltage range that lies at least partially within one hundred fifteen to one hundred thirty volts (115 V to 130 V), and that falls into either of the following categories: a blown PAR (BPAR), bulged reflector (BR), or elliptical reflector (ER) bulb shape or similar bulb shape with a diameter equal to or greater than two and one-quarter inches (2.25"); or a reflector (R), parabolic aluminized reflector (PARA) bulged reflector (BR) or similar bulb shape with a diameter of two and one-quarter inches to two and three-quarter inches (2.25” to 2.75"), inclusive.

“Torchiere” means a portable electric lighting fixture with a reflective bowl that directs light upward onto a ceiling so as to produce indirect illumination on the surfaces below. A torchiere may include downward-directed lamps in addition to the upward, indirect illumination.

“Traffic signal module” means a standard eight-inch (8) (two hundred millimeter (200 mm)) or twelve-inch (12) (three hundred millimeter (300 mm)) traffic signal indication, consisting of a light source, a lens, and all other parts necessary for operation.

“Transformer” means a device consisting of two (2) or more coils of insulated wire and that is designed to transfer alternating current by electromagnetic induction from one coil to another to change the original voltage or current value. The term “transformer” does not include:

Transformers with multiple voltage taps, with the highest voltage tap equaling at least twenty percent (20%) more than the lowest voltage tap; or

Transformers, such as those commonly known as drive transformers, rectifier transformers, auto-transformers, uninterruptible power system transformers, impedance transformers, regulating transformers, sealed and nonventilating transformers, machine tool transformers, welding transformers, grounding transformers, or testing transformers, that are designed to be used in a special purpose application and are unlikely to be used in general purpose applications.

“Unit heater” means a self-contained, vented, fan-type commercial space heater that uses natural gas or propane, and that is designed to be installed without ducts within a heated space, except that such term does not include any products covered by federal standards established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 6291 and subsequent sections or any product that is a direct vent, forced flue heater with a sealed combustion burner.

“Walk-in refrigerator” and “walk-in freezer” mean a space, designed for the purpose of storing and/or merchandising food, beverages, and/or ice, that is refrigerated to temperatures, respectively, at or above and below thirty-two (32) degrees F that can be walked into.

“Water dispenser” means a factory-made assembly that mechanically cools and heats potable water and that dispenses the cooled or heated water by integral or remote means.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 22.

39-27-4.
Scope.

The provisions of this chapter apply to the following types of new products sold, offered for sale, or installed in the state:

Automatic commercial icemakers;

Commercial clothes washers;

Commercial pre-rinse spray valves;

Commercial refrigerators, freezers, and refrigerator-freezers;

High-intensity discharge lamp ballasts;

Illuminated exit signs;

Large packaged air-conditioning equipment;

Low-voltage dry-type distribution transformers;

Metal-halide lamp fixtures;

Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies;

Torchieres;

Traffic signal modules; and

Unit heaters.

The provisions of this chapter also apply to the following types of new products sold, offered for sale, or installed in the state:

Bottle-type water dispensers;

Commercial hot food holding cabinets;

Residential boilers and residential furnaces;

State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps; and

Walk-in refrigerators and walk-in freezers.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

New products manufactured in the state and sold outside the state;

New products manufactured outside the state and sold at wholesale inside the state for final retail sale and installation outside the state;

Products installed in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction; or

Products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 288, § 1.

39-27-5.
Efficiency standards.

Not later than June 1, 2006, the commission, in consultation with the state building commissioner and the chief of energy and community services, shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, establishing minimum efficiency standards for the types of new products set forth in §

39-27-4(a)

. The regulations shall provide for the following minimum efficiency standards:

Automatic commercial icemakers shall meet the energy efficiency requirements shown in table A-7 of § 1605.3 of the California Code of Regulations, Title 20: Division 2, Chapter 4, Article 4: Appliance Efficiency Regulations as adopted on December 15, 2004.

Commercial clothes washers shall meet the requirements shown in Table P-4 of § 1605.3 of the California Code of Regulations, Title 20: Division 2, Chapter 4, Article 4: Appliance Efficiency Regulations in effect on December 15, 2004.

Commercial pre-rinse spray valves shall have a flow rate equal to or less than one and six-tenths gallons (1.6 gals.) per minute.

Commercial refrigerators, freezers, and refrigerator-freezers shall meet the minimum efficiency requirements shown in Table A-6 of § 1605.3 of the California Code of Regulations, Title 20: Division 2, Chapter 4, Article 4: Appliance Efficiency Regulations as adopted on December 15, 2004, except that pulldown refrigerators with transparent doors shall meet a requirement five percent (5%) less stringent than shown in the California regulations.

High-intensity discharge lamp ballasts shall not be designed and marketed to operate a mercury vapor lamp.

Illuminated exit signs shall have an input power demand of five watts (5 W) or less per illuminated face.

Large packaged air-conditioning equipment shall meet a minimum energy efficiency ratio of:

Ten (10.0) for air conditioning without an integrated heating component or with electric resistance heating integrated into the unit;

Nine and eight tenths (9.8) for air conditioning with heating other than electric resistance integrated into the unit;

Nine and five tenths (9.5) for air conditioning with heating other than electric resistance integrated heating component or with electric resistance heating integrated into the unit;

Nine and three tenths (9.3) for air-conditioning heat pump equipment with heating other than electric resistance integrated into the unit. Large packaged air-conditioning heat pumps shall meet a minimum coefficient of performance in the heating mode of three and two tenths (3.2) (measured at a high temperature rating of forty-seven (47) degrees F db).

Low-voltage dry-type distribution transformers shall meet the Class 1 efficiency levels for low-voltage distribution transformers specified in Table 4-2 of the “Guide for Determining Energy Efficiency for Distribution Transformers” published by the National Electrical Manufacturers Association (NEMA Standard TP-1-2002).

Metal-halide lamp fixtures that operate in a vertical position and are designed to be operated with lamps rated greater than or equal to one hundred fifty watts (150 W) but less than or equal to five hundred watts (500 W) shall not contain a probe-start metal-halide lamp ballast.

Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall meet the tier-one energy-efficiency requirements shown in Table U-1 of § 1605.3 of the California Code of Regulations, Title 20: Division 2, Chapter 4, Article 4: Appliance Efficiency Regulations as adopted on December 15, 2004. This standard applies to single-voltage AC to DC power supplies that are sold individually and to those that are sold as a component of or in conjunction with another product. Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies that are made available by a product manufacturer as service parts or spare parts for its products manufactured prior to January 1, 2008, shall be exempt from this provision.

Torchieres shall not use more than one hundred ninety watts (190 W). A torchiere shall be deemed to use more than one hundred ninety watts (190 W) if any commercially available lamp or combination of lamps can be inserted in its socket(s) and cause the torchiere to draw more than one hundred ninety watts (190 W) when operated at full brightness.

Traffic signal modules shall meet the product specification of the “Energy Star Program Requirements for Traffic Signals” developed by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency that took effect in February 2001 and shall be installed with compatible, electronically-connected signal-control interface devices and conflict-monitoring systems.

Unit heaters shall be equipped with an intermittent ignition device and shall have either power venting or an automatic flue damper.

Not later than June 1, 2007, the commission, in consultation with the state building commissioner and the chief of energy and community services, shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, establishing minimum efficiency standards for the types of new products set forth in §

39-27-4(b)

. The regulations shall provide for the following minimum efficiency standards.

Bottle-type water dispensers designed for dispensing both hot and cold water shall not have standby energy consumption greater than one and two-tenths kilowatt-hours (1.2 KWh) per day.

Commercial hot food holding cabinets shall have a maximum idle energy rate of forty watts (40 W) per cubic foot of interior volume.

Residential furnaces and residential boilers shall comply with the following Annual Fuel Utilization Efficiency (AFUE) and electricity ratio values:

The chief of energy and community services shall adopt rules to provide for exemptions from compliance with the foregoing residential furnace or residential boiler AFUE standards at any building, site, or location where complying with the standards would be in conflict with any local zoning ordinance, fire code, building or plumbing code, or other rule regarding installation and venting of residential furnaces or residential boilers.

The provisions of subsection (b) shall be effective upon determination by the chief of energy and community services that the same or substantial corresponding standards have been enacted in two (2) New England states.

State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps shall meet the minimum average lamp efficacy requirements for federally-regulated incandescent reflector lamps contained in 42 U.S.C. § 6295(i)(1)(B).

The following types of incandescent reflector lamps are exempt from these requirements:

Lamps, rated at fifty watts (50 W) or less of the following types: BR30, BR40, ER30, and ER40;

Lamps, rated at sixty-five watts (65 W) of the following types: BR30, BR40, and ER40; and

R20 lamps of forty-five watts (45 W) or less.

Walk-in refrigerators and walk-in freezers with the applicable motor types shown in the table below shall include the required components shown.

In addition to the requirements in subsection (b)(5)(i), walk-in refrigerators and walk-in freezers with transparent reach-in doors shall meet the following requirements: transparent reach-in doors shall be of triple-pane glass with either heat-reflective treated glass or gas fill; if the appliance has an anti-sweat heater without anti-sweat controls, then: the appliance shall have a total door rail, glass, and frame heater power draw of no more than forty watts (40 W) if it is a freezer or seventeen watts (17 W) if it is a refrigerator per foot of door frame width; and if the appliance has an anti-sweat heater with anti-sweat heat controls, and the total door rail, glass, and frame heater power draw is more than forty watts (40 W) if it is a freezer or seventeen watts (17 W) if it is a refrigerator per foot of door frame width, then: the anti-sweat heat controls shall reduce the energy use of the anti-sweat heater in an amount corresponding to the relative humidity in the air outside the door or to the condensation on the inner-glass pane.

Product Type Minimum AFUE Maximumelectricity ratio Natural gas and propane-fired furnaces 90% 2.0% Oil-fired furnaces>94,000 Btu/hour in capacity 83% 2.0% Oil-fired furnaces>94,000 Btu/hour in capacity 83% 2.3% Natural gas and oil, and propane-fired hot water residential boilers 84% Not applicable Natural gas, oil, and propane-fired steam residential boilers 82% Not applicable

Click to view

MOTOR Type Required Components All Interior lights: light sources with an efficacy of forty-five (45) lumens per watt or more, including ballast losses (if any). This efficacy standard does not apply to LED light sources until January 1, 2010. All Automatic door closers that firmly close all reach-in doors. All Automatic door closers that firmly close all walk-in doors no wider than 3.9 feet and no higher than 6.9 feet that have been closed to within one inch of full closure. All Wall, ceiling, and door insulation at least R-28 for refrigerators and at least R-34 for freezers All Floor insulation at least R-28 for freezers (no requirements for refrigerators) Condenser fan motors of under one horsepower Electronically commutated motors, Permanently split capacitor-type motors Polyphase motors of one half (1/2) horsepower or more Single-phase evaporator fan motors of under one horsepower and less than four hundred sixty (460) volts Electronically commutated motors

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 22.

39-27-6.
Implementation.

No new commercial clothes washer, commercial pre-rinse spray valve, high-intensity discharge lamp ballast, illuminated exit sign, low-voltage dry-type distribution transformer, torchiere, traffic signal module, or unit heater after January 1, 2007, may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to §

39-27-5

. No bottle-type water dispenser, commercial hot food holding cabinet, metal-halide lamp fixture, single-voltage external AC to DC power supply, state-regulated incandescent reflector lamp, or walk-in refrigerator or walk-in freezer manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to §

39-27-5

. No new automatic commercial icemaker, commercial refrigerator, refrigerator-freezer, or freezer or large packaged air-conditioning equipment manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to § 39-27-5.

No later than six (6) months after the effective date of this chapter, the chief of energy and community services, in consultation with the attorney general, shall determine if implementation of state standards for residential furnaces and residential boilers requires a waiver from federal preemption. If the chief of energy and community services determines that a waiver from federal preemption is not needed, then no new residential furnace or residential boiler manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, or the date that is one year after the date of the determination, if later, may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to §

39-27-5

. If the chief of energy and community services determines that a waiver from federal preemption is required, then the chief of energy and community services shall apply for the waiver within one year of the determination and upon approval of such waiver application, the applicable state standards shall go into effect at the earliest date permitted by federal law.

One year after the date upon which sale or offering for sale of certain products is limited pursuant to this section, no new products may be installed for compensation in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to §

39-27-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 288, § 1.

39-27-7.
New and revised standards.

The commission may adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, to establish increased efficiency standards for the products listed in §

39-27-4

. In considering such amended standards, the commission, in consultation with the chief of energy and community services, shall set efficiency standards upon a determination that increased efficiency standards would serve to promote energy conservation in the state and would be cost-effective for consumers who purchase and use such products; provided, that increased efficiency standards shall become effective within one year following the adoption of any amended regulations establishing such increased efficiency standards.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1.

39-27-8.
Testing, certification, and enforcement.

The manufacturers of products covered by the chapter shall test samples of their products in accordance with the test procedures adopted pursuant to this chapter or those specified in the state building code. The chief of energy and community services, in consultation with the state building commissioner, shall adopt test procedures for determining the energy efficiency of the products covered by §

39-27-4

if the procedures are not provided for in this section, and §

39-27-5

or in the state building code, except that the test procedure for:

Automatic commercial icemakers shall be the test standard specified by the Air Conditioning and Refrigeration Institute Standard 810-2003, as in effect on January 1, 2005;

Bottle-type water dispensers shall be measured in accordance with the test criteria contained in version 1 of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s “Energy Star Program/Requirement for Bottled Water Coolers,” except units with an integral, automatic timer shall not be tested using Section D, “Timer Usage,” of the test criteria;

Commercial hot food holding cabinets shall be the “idle energy rate-dry test” on ASTM F2140-01, “Standard Test Method for Performance of Hot Food Holding Cabinets” published by ASTM International Interior volume and shall be measured in accordance with the method shown in the U.S. Commercial Hot Food Holding Cabinets as in effect on August 15, 2003; and

Residential furnaces and boilers AFUE shall be measured in accordance with the federal test method for measuring the energy consumption of furnaces and boilers contained in Appendix N to subpart B of part 430, title 10, Code of Federal Regulations.

The chief of energy and community services shall use U.S. Department of Energy approved test methods, or in the absence of such test methods, other appropriate nationally recognized test methods. The chief of energy and community services may use updated test methods when new versions of test procedures become available.

Manufacturers of new products covered by §

39-27-4

, except for single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies, high-intensity discharge lamp ballasts, walk-in refrigerators and walk-in freezers, shall certify to the chief of energy and community services that the products are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The certifications shall be based on test results. The chief of energy and community services shall promulgate regulations governing the certification of the products and may coordinate with the certification programs of other states and federal agencies.

The chief of energy and community services may test products covered by §

39-27-4

. If the products so tested are found not to be in compliance with the minimum efficiency standards established under §

39-27-5

, the chief of energy and community services shall:

Charge the manufacturer of the product for the cost of product purchase and testing; and

Make information available to the public on products found not to be in compliance with the standards.

With prior notice and at reasonable and convenient hours, the chief of energy and community services may cause periodic inspections to be made of distributors or retailers of new products covered by §

39-27-4

in order to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The chief of energy and community services shall also coordinate in accordance with §

23-27.3-111.7

regarding inspections prior to occupancy of newly constructed buildings containing new products that are also covered by the state building code.

The chief of energy and community services shall investigate complaints received concerning violations of this chapter. Any manufacturer, distributor, or retailer who violates any provision of this chapter shall be issued a warning by the chief of energy and community services for any first violation. Repeat violations shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). Each violation shall constitute a separate offense, and each day that the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. Penalties assessed under this subsection are in addition to costs assessed under subsection (d) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 288, § 1.

39-27-9.
Severability of provisions.

The provisions of this chapter shall be severable and if the application of any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the application of any other clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 146, § 1.